Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-803
Condominium property regime; established.

Whenever a sole owner or the co-owners of property expressly declare, through the recordation of a master deed, which shall set forth the particulars enumerated in section 76-809, their desire to submit their property to the regime established by sections 76-801 to 76-823, there shall thereby be established a condominium property regime.

Laws 1963, c. 429, § 3, p. 1437;

Laws 1974, LB 730, § 2.